Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Revisor’s notes. —

In 1977, “commissioner of transportation and public facilities” and “Department of Transportation and Public Facilities” were substituted for “commissioner of highways” and “Department of Highways” throughout the title in order to implement § 11, Executive Order No. 39 (1977). The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1988 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1988, 1996, 2008, and 2014 to make minor word changes under AS

01.05.031

.

Administrative Code. —

For transportation and public facilities, see 17 AAC.